Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2716.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 22 of the General Laws entitled "GENERAL ASSEMBLY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 11.1
JOINT COMMITTEE OF THE REPEALER
22-11.1-1. Joint committee of the repealer – Composition.
(a) There is hereby created a joint committee of the repealer. The joint committee of the
repealer shall consist of six (6) members: three (3) of whom shall be members of the senate, not
more than two (2) from the same political party, to be appointed by the senate president; and three
(3) of whom shall be members of the house of representatives, not more than two (2) from the same
political party to be appointed by the speaker of the house.
(b) The senate president and the speaker of the house shall consult with the house and
senate minority leaders on the appointment of the minority members.
22-11.1-2. Powers and duties of joint committee of the repealer.
(a) The joint committee of the repealer shall have the authority to:
(1) Compile suggestions for repeal of statutes, regulations, and executive orders received
from citizens, businesses, and government agencies, including, but not limited to, those that are not
considered "business-friendly", and those that are archaic and out of date;
(2) Following review of suggestions, make recommendations to the general assembly and
propose repeal of statutes and regulations through legislation; and

(3) Following review of suggestions may make recommendations for repeal of executive
orders to the governor.
22-11.1-3. Duration of joint committee of the repealer.
The committee shall be in existence until December 31, 2032, unless further extended by
the general assembly.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005333
========
LC005333 - Page 2 of 3